Nebraska, session 109, LB887.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB887 LB887
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 38-2852, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2852 Every applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall be
required to attain a passing grade to be determined by the board in an
examination in pharmacy and in an examination in jurisprudence of
pharmacy. The jurisprudence examination may occur at a time, before or
after graduation, as determined by the accredited pharmacy program
attended by the applicant.
Sec. 2. Section 38-2866.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
38-2866.01 (1) A pharmacist may supervise any combination of
pharmacy technicians and pharmacist interns at any time up to a total of
four people.
(2) A pharmacist intern shall be supervised at all times while
performing the functions of a pharmacist intern which may include all
aspects of the practice of pharmacy unless otherwise restricted. This
subsection does not apply to a pharmacist intern who is receiving
experiential training directed by the accredited pharmacy program in
which he or she is enrolled.
(3) For any pharmacist supervising four pharmacy technicians or
pharmacist interns, at least one individual person shall be a certified
pharmacy technician pursuant to section 38-2890.
Sec. 3. Section 38-2871, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2871 (1) Original prescription information for any controlled
substances listed in Schedule III, IV, or V of section 28-405 and other
prescription drugs or devices not listed in section 28-405 may be
transferred between pharmacies for the purpose of refill dispensing on a
one-time basis, except that pharmacies electronically sharing a real-
time, online database may transfer up to the maximum refills permitted by
law and as authorized by the prescribing practitioner on the
-2-

LB887 LB887
2026 2026
prescription. Transfers are subject to the following:
(a) The transfer is communicated directly between two pharmacists or
pharmacist interns except when the pharmacies can use a real-time, online
database;
(b) The transferring pharmacist or pharmacist intern indicates void
on the record of the prescription;
(c) The transferring pharmacist or pharmacist intern indicates on
the record of the prescription the name, the address, and, if a
controlled substance, the Drug Enforcement Administration number of the
pharmacy to which the information was transferred, the name of the
pharmacist or pharmacist intern receiving the information, the date of
transfer, and the name of the transferring pharmacist or pharmacist
intern;
(d) The receiving pharmacist or pharmacist intern indicates on the
record of the transferred prescription that the prescription is
transferred;
(e) The transferred prescription includes the following information:
(i) The date of issuance of the original prescription;
(ii) The original number of refills authorized;
(iii) The date of original dispensing;
(iv) The number of valid refills remaining;
(v) The date and location of last refill; and
(vi) The name, the address, and, if a controlled substance, the Drug
Enforcement Administration number of the pharmacy from which the transfer
was made, the name of the pharmacist or pharmacist intern transferring
the information, the original prescription number, and the date of
transfer; and
(f) Both the original and transferred prescriptions must be
maintained by the transferring and receiving pharmacy for a period of
five years from the date of transfer.
(2) Prescription drugs or devices not listed in section 28-405 may
-3-

LB887 LB887
2026 2026
be transferred between pharmacies for the purpose of refill dispensing if
(a) the number of transfers does not exceed the number of originally
authorized refills and (b) the original prescription is still valid.
(3) (2) Nothing in this section shall prevent a pharmacist from
forwarding an original prescription for a noncontrolled substance to
another pharmacy at the request of the patient or the patient’s
caregiver. An original prescription for a controlled substance shall not
be forwarded to another pharmacy unless permitted under 21 C.F.R.
1306.25.
Sec. 4. Section 81-6,101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,101 The department shall:
(1) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, including a uniform
system of classification of Parkinson's disease which is consistent with
medically and clinically accepted standards and definitions for use in
reporting by medical personnel treating the disease;
(2) Execute any contracts that the department deems necessary to
carry out the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act;
(3) Receive and record the data obtained from a report reports filed
under section sections 81-6,102 and 81-6,103; and
(4) Comply with all necessary requirements to obtain funds or
grants.
Sec. 5. Section 81-6,106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,106 Nothing in the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act requires a
physician or pharmacist to deny medical treatment or services to an
individual who refuses to provide the information necessary to make a
complete report as reports required under section 81-6,102 or 81-6,103.
Sec. 6. Section 81-6,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,107 Any physician or pharmacist required to make a report
-4-

LB887 LB887
2026 2026
reports under section 81-6,102 or 81-6,103 is immune from liability,
civil, criminal, or otherwise, for filing an incomplete report as a
result of the failure of an individual to provide the information
necessary to make such report.
Sec. 7. Original sections 38-2871, 81-6,101, 81-6,106, and
81-6,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 38-2852, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 38-2866.01, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 8. The following section is outright repealed: Section
81-6,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-5-